Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 4. Names

§ 17-19-401.
Corporate name.

A corporate name may not contain language stating or implying that the corporation is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by W.S.

17-19-301

and its articles of incorporation.

Except as authorized by subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a corporate name shall not be the same as, or deceptively similar to the name of any trademark or service mark registered in this state and shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from other business names as required by W.S.

17-16-401

.

A corporation may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 17-16-401(c).

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 80, § 3.

A corporation may use the name, including the fictitious name, of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state and the proposed user corporation:

Has merged with the other corporation; or

Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 80, § 3.

This act does not control the use of fictitious names.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 1996, ch. 80, §§ 2, 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in subsection (e), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

§ 17-19-402.
Reserved name.

A person may apply to reserve the exclusive use of a corporate name, including a fictitious name for a foreign corporation whose corporate name is not available, by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application shall set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the corporate name applied for is available, he shall file the application pursuant to W.S.

17-19-125

and reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a nonrenewable one hundred twenty (120) day period.

The owner of a reserved corporate name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a manually signed notice of the transfer that states the name and address of the transferee.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.